Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. Branches, Conversion, Merger, and Consolidation.

Sec. 06.15.290.
Establishment of branches.

A mutual bank may, with the approval of the department, establish and operate branches inside the state. Before approving the establishment and operation of a branch office, the department shall make the findings required before the granting of a charter to a mutual bank with respect to the branch proposed.

History.

(§ 12 ch 132 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of mutual savings banks, see 3 AAC 6, art. 3.

Sec. 06.15.300.
Conversion of thrift institution to mutual bank.

Any thrift institution other than a mutual bank may, with the approval of the department, convert itself into a mutual bank upon the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the votes cast by those entitled to vote upon its affairs at a duly called and held meeting and shall thereupon possess the powers of and be subject to the duties imposed upon mutual banks under the provisions of this chapter. Before approving a conversion, the department shall determine that the thrift institution seeking conversion has the ability to discharge the duties and conform to the restrictions upon mutual banks and has previously so conformed to the extent required by the department.
However, the institution may retain and service all accounts lawfully held by it on the date of its conversion.

History.

(§ 13 a, b ch 132 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For reorganization, liquidation and dissolution, see 3 AAC 6, art. 4.

Sec. 06.15.310.
Conversion of mutual bank to thrift institution.

A mutual bank may, with the approval of the regulatory authority having jurisdiction over the creation of the thrift institution and upon the affirmative vote of a majority of its corporators, convert itself into a thrift institution organized under federal law or the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 13 c ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.320.
Merger and consolidation of mutual banks.

Two or more mutual banks may, with the approval of the department, and upon the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of the corporators of each such mutual bank, enter into an agreement of merger or consolidation. Thereafter the merger or consolidation shall be effective under the terms of the agreement.

History.

(§ 14 a ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.330.
Condition of department approval.

Before approving a merger or consolidation the department shall give consideration to the purposes of this chapter and the prospects of the surviving or consolidated mutual bank for financial success and its ability to discharge the duties and conform to the restrictions imposed upon a mutual bank.

History.

(§ 14 b ch 132 SLA 1960)

Sec. 06.15.340.
Transfer and exercise of rights.

All rights, franchises, and property interests of the merged or consolidating mutual banks are transferred to and vested in the surviving or consolidated mutual bank by virtue of the merger or consolidation without the requirement under this chapter of a deed or other instrument of transfer. The surviving or consolidated mutual bank may exercise all rights and privileges of the merged or consolidating mutual banks in accordance with the terms of the merger or consolidation agreement. The surviving or consolidated mutual bank is responsible for all debts and obligations of the merged or consolidating mutual bank under the terms of the merger or consolidation agreement.

History.

(§ 14 c, d ch 132 SLA 1960)